District of Columbia statutes.
46-226.02

Filing of identifying information by parties to paternity and support proceedings.

(a)

Upon the first personal appearance before the IV-D agency or the Court in a paternity or child support matter, or upon entry of an order of paternity or child support, whichever is earlier, each party to a paternity or child support proceeding in the District of Columbia shall file and update as necessary with the IV-D agency and with the Court the following information:

(1)

Name;

(2)

Residential and mailing addresses and telephone numbers;

(3)

Name, address, and telephone number of all employers, including all names under which each employer does business, and, if the party is self-employed, the party’s business address and all names under which the party does business;

(4)

Social security number; and

(5)

Driver’s license number.

(b)

Provision of information pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the safeguards provided to victims or potential victims of domestic violence under § 16-925 and any applicable privacy protections under federal or District law.

(c)

A party shall update any information required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section within 10 days of any change in that information.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 27b
as added Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 108(z), 48 DCR 1270
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3403(q), 51 DCR 8441

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-205 and § 46-214.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-205, in subsec. (a), substituted “with the Court” for “with the Collection and Disbursement Unit”.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7(y) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 107(z) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 107(z) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 7(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary addition of section, see § 7(y) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(y) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(y) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(y) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 107(z) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 107(z) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 107(z) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 107(z) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 108(z) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(q) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(q) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).